Massachusetts, session 194th, S1573.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby further amended by inserting after Section 70H the following section:- 
Section 70I: Congenital cytomegalovirus; public information program; annual report 
(a) The commissioner of the department shall establish, promote, and maintain a public 
information program regarding congenital cytomegalovirus, hereinafter referred to as cCMV. 
Such program shall be conducted throughout the commonwealth, and under said program, a 
hospital or birthing facility as defined in section 70E or any healthcare provider, physician 
assistant, nurse or midwife who renders prenatal or postnatal care shall give expectant or new 
parents or guardians information provided by the department under subsection (b). Such 

of 5 10 information shall be made available at the first prenatal appointment or at a preconception visit if 
applicable, whichever is earliest.  
(b) The department shall make available to any healthcare provider, physician assistant, 
nurse or midwife who renders prenatal or postnatal care or offers fertility counseling or care to a 
parent or guardian the following: (i) up-to-date evidence-based, written information about cCMV 
and universal cCMV screening that has been vetted by an appropriate group of medical experts 
as determined by the department in conjunction with the advisory committee as established in 
section 110J of said Chapter 111; provided, however, that the written information provided shall 
include preventative measures that can be taken throughout pregnancy, and (ii) contact or other 
referral information for additional educational and support resources. The department may also 
make such information available to any other person who seeks information about cCMV 
infections. 
SECTION 2. Said chapter 111 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 110C 
the following sections:- 
Section 110D: Required Newborn Screening for Congenital Cytomegalovirus  
For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly 
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
“Birthing facility”, an inpatient or ambulatory health care facility licensed by the 
department of public health that provides birthing and newborn care services. 

of 5 29  “Congenital Cytomegalovirus (hereinafter referred to as cCMV) screening”, the 
identification of a newborn who may have congenital CMV infection or has cCMV confirmed 
through the use of a saliva or urine test.  
“Department”, the department of public health. 
“Newborn,” any liveborn infant who has not yet attained the age of 21 days from a birth 
occurring in the commonwealth or from a birth prior to transfer to a hospital in the 
commonwealth.  
The department, in consultation with the perinatal advisory committee, shall develop 
regulations for all hospitals and birthing facilities requiring cCMV screening. These regulations 
shall consider evidence-based guidance. During the first year after the passage of this legislation, 
the department shall undertake a pilot program for universal cCMV screening to optimize 
processes for testing, reporting, and medical care. At the discretion of the department, planning 
shall include other stakeholders in universal cCMV screening, such as parents, healthcare 
providers, New England Newborn Screening Program, or birth centers. Universal cCMV 
screening will start during the second year after the passage of this legislation. 
The cCMV screening shall be performed using a saliva PCR test unless one is 
unavailable in which case a urine PCR test may be used. If positive, a saliva PCR test would 
require a confirmatory urine PCR test. The department may approve another test to conduct 
cCMV screening; provided, however, that the test shall be, at the discretion of the department, at 
least as accurate, widely available and cost-effective as a saliva or urine PCR test. A screening 
shall be performed within 21 days from the date of birth and before the newborn infant is 
discharged from the birthing facility to the care of the parent or guardian; provided, however, 

of 5 51 that the screening shall not be performed if the parent or guardian of the newborn infant objects 
to the screening based upon a sincerely held religious belief of the parent or guardian. The 
cCMV educational materials outlined in section 70I(b) shall be provided to the parent or 
guardian of the infant at the time of cCMV screening. 
A hospital that provides birthing and newborn services or a birthing facility shall adopt 
protocols for cCMV screening using a saliva or urine PCR test or another test approved by the 
department under this section for all newborns prior to discharge, and not to exceed 21 days from 
the date of birth, based on the department’s regulations, on or before January 1, 2028. 
The cost of providing the newborn cCMV screening shall be a covered benefit 
reimbursable by all health insurers, except for supplemental policies that only provide coverage 
for specific diseases, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement or other supplemental policies. In 
the absence of a third-party payer, the charges for the newborn cCMV screening shall be paid by 
the Commonwealth. 
A hospital or birthing facility shall report annually to the department data including, but 
not limited to, the number of cCMV tests administered and the outcomes of said tests. The 
hospital or birthing facility shall inform, orally and in writing, a parent or guardian of the 
newborn infant the result of the cCMV screening test regardless of its outcome. This information 
shall also be provided in writing to the newborn infant's primary care physician and to the 
department through its electronic birth certificate system or such mechanism as specified by the 
department. 
The department shall review the protocols required under this section and the 
implementation of these protocols as part of its birthing facility licensure review processes. 

of 5 73  The department shall promulgate regulations to implement the cCMV screening program. 
Nothing in this statute shall preclude newborns born at home from obtaining said cCMV 
screening. 
Section 110E: Advisory Committee for CMV Screening Program 
There is hereby established an advisory committee for the purpose of implementing the 
provisions of Section 110I. The advisory committee shall consist of the following members to be 
appointed by the commissioner of the department: a representative of the hospital industry; a 
primary care pediatrician or family practitioner; an otolaryngologist; a neonatologist; an 
infectious disease specialist; a clinician representing newborn nurseries; an audiologist; an 
ophthalmologist; an obstetrician-gynecologist; a representative of the commonwealth's early 
intervention program; 2 parents and/or guardians of a child impacted by cCMV; 2 medical 
professionals; a developer of preventative and/or therapeutic interventions for cCMV; a teacher 
of the deaf; and a representative of the department. 
The advisory committee shall advise the department regarding the validity and cost of 
proposed cCMV regulations and/or cCMV screening, and shall recommend standards for 
performing and interpreting screening tests based on the most current technological methods, for 
documenting test results and follow-up, and for facilitating interaction between professionals and 
agencies that participate in follow-up care. Members of the advisory committee shall serve 
without compensation. The advisory committee shall be provided support services by the 
department.